District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0084.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may be
cited as the “Youth Workforce Development Programs Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 202(3) of the Criminal Background Checks for the Protection of Children
Act of 2004, effective April 13, 2005 (D.C. Law 15-353; D.C. Official Code § 4-1501.02(3)), is
amended to read as follows:
“(3) “Covered child or youth services provider”:
“(A) Means any District government agency providing direct services to
children or youth and any private entity that is licensed by or contracts with the District to provide
direct services to children or youth, or for the benefit of children or youth, that affect the health,
safety, and welfare of children or youth, including individual and group counseling, therapy, case
management, supervision, or mentoring.
“(B) The term “covered child or youth services provider” does not include
foster parents or grantees.
“(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, the term “covered
child or youth services provider” includes an employee or volunteer of a host employer or grantee
participating in programs established pursuant to section 2a of the Youth Employment Act of 1979,
effective January 5, 1980 (D.C. Law 3-46; D.C. Official Code § 32-242), who has direct contact
with or unsupervised access to youth participating in such programs.”.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 3. Section 2a of the Youth Employment Act of 1979, effective January 5, 1980 (D.C.
Law 3-46; D.C. Official Code § 32-242), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (h) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the semicolon and inserting the phrase “;
and” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (2) is repealed.
(3) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “closing ceremony” and
inserting the word “activities” in its place.
(b) A new subsection (i) is added to read as follows:
“(i) The Department of Employment Services is authorized to perform criminal background
checks and traffic record checks for employees and volunteers of host employers or grantees
participating in programs established pursuant to this section in accordance with the Criminal
Background Checks for the Protection of Children Act of 2004, effective April 13, 2005 (D.C. Law
15-353; D.C. Official Code § 4-1501.01 et seq.).”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor,
action by the Council to override the veto) and shall remain in effect for no longer than 90 days, as
provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section 412(a) of the
District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788; D.C. Official
Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2